North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 63. Conference of Clerks of Superior Court.

§ 7A-805.
Establishment and purpose.

There is created the Conference of Clerks of Superior Court of North Carolina, of which each clerk of superior court is a member. The purpose of the Conference is to assist in improving the administration of justice in North Carolina by coordinating the efforts of the various clerks of superior court, by assisting them in the administration of their offices, and by exercising the powers and performing the duties provided for in this Article.

History.

2005-100, s. 1.

§ 7A-806.
Annual meetings; organization; election of officers.

Annual Meetings. — The Conference shall meet each summer and winter at a time and place selected by the President of the Conference.

Election of Officers. — Officers of the Conference are a President, two Vice Presidents, a Secretary, a Treasurer, and other officers from among its membership that the Conference may designate in its bylaws. Officers are elected for one-year terms at the annual summer conference and take office immediately following their election.

Executive Committee. — The Executive Committee of the Conference consists of the President, the two Vice Presidents, the Secretary, the Treasurer, and seven other members of the Conference. One of these seven members shall be the immediate past president if there is one and that past president continues to be a member.

Organization and Functioning; Bylaws. — The bylaws may provide for the organization and functioning of the Conference, including the powers and duties of its officers and committees. The bylaws shall state the number of members required to constitute a quorum at any meeting of the Conference or the Executive Committee. The bylaws shall set out the procedure for amending the bylaws.

Calling Meetings; Duty to Attend. — The President or the Executive Committee may call a meeting of the Conference upon 10 days’ notice to the members, except upon written waiver of notice signed by at least three-fourths of the members. A member should attend each meeting of the Conference and the Executive Committee of which he is given notice. Members are entitled to reimbursement for travel and subsistence expenses at the rate applicable to State employees.

History.

2005-100, s. 1; 2006-66, s. 14.20(a); 2006-221, s. 15.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-66, s. 14.20(a), as added by Session Laws 2006-221, s. 15, effective July 1, 2006, deleted “on July 1” following “take office” in the second sentence of subsection (b).

§ 7A-807.
Powers of Conference.

The Conference may:

Cooperate with citizens and other public and private agencies to promote the effective administration of justice.

Develop advisory manuals to assist in the organization and administration of their offices, case management, calendaring, case tracking, filing, and office procedures.

Work with the cooperation of the Administrative Office of the Courts and the Institute of Government of the School of Government at UNC-Chapel Hill to provide education and training programs for the clerks of superior court and their staff.

The Conference may not adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

History.

2005-100, s. 1.

§ 7A-808.
Executive secretary; clerical support.

The Conference may employ an executive secretary and any necessary supporting staff to assist it in carrying out its duties.

History.

2005-100, s. 1.

§ 7A-809.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-243, s. 13, effective November 6, 2019.

History.

2009-355, s. 4; 2010-96, s. 1; 2014-100, s. 18B.1(c); repealed by 2019-243, s. 13, effective November 6, 2019.